District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

22-2902

Sale of unwholesome food — “Food” defined.

Repealed.

Dec. 16, 1941, 55 Stat. 807, ch. 587, § 2
May 2, 2002, D.C. Law 14-116, § 8(f), 49 DCR 1945
1981 Ed., § 22-3417.
1973 Ed., § 22-3417.

Section 8(f) of D.C. Law 14-55 repealed §§ 22-2901 to 22-2907.

Section 10(b) of D.C. Law 14-55 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.

For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 8(f) of Food Regulation Emergency Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-128, August 3, 2001, 48 DCR 7939).
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 8(f) of Food Regulation Legislative Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-147, October 23, 2001, 48 DCR 10183).